Washington statutes.
RCW 18.57.001

Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the Washington state board of osteopathic medicine and surgery;

(2) "Department" means the department of health;

(3) "Maintenance of certification" means the satisfactory participation in a formal recertification program to maintain board certification after initial certification from the American osteopathic association bureau of osteopathic specialists, the American board of medical specialties, or other accrediting organization recognized by the board;

(4) "Osteopathic medicine and surgery" means the use of any and all methods in the treatment of disease, injuries, deformities, and all other physical and mental conditions in and of human beings, including the use of osteopathic manipulative therapy; and

(5) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

[ 2018 c 211 s 3; 1996 c 178 s 2; 1991 c 160 s 1; 1991 c 3 s 147; 1979 c 117 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1996 c 178: See note following RCW 18.35.110.